Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-412 Participation loans. Participation
loans to credit union members jointly with other credit unions, credit union
service organizations, or financial organizations shall be in accordance with
written policies of the board of directors. A credit union which originates a
loan for which participation arrangements are made in accordance with this
section shall retain an interest of at least ten per cent of the face amount of
the loan. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next